District of Columbia statutes.
28-3505

New promise or acknowledgement of debt incurred during infancy.

An action may not be maintained to charge a person upon an acknowledgment of, or promise to pay, a debt contracted during infancy, made after full age, except for necessaries, unless the acknowledgement or promise is in writing signed by the party to be charged therewith. This section does not affect ratification by conduct.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 88-509, § 1
1973 Ed., § 28-3505.
1981 Ed., § 28-3505.
Age of majority, contracts, see § 28:1-103.